Utah statutes.
62A-3-307.   Photographing, video, and audio taping.

Law enforcement or Adult Protective Services investigators may collect evidence regarding alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult by taking, or causing to be taken, photographs, video tape recordings, or audio or video tape accounts of a vulnerable adult, if the vulnerable adult:

(1)  consents to the taking of the photographs, video tape recordings, or audio or video tape accounts; or

(2)  lacks the capacity to give the consent described in Subsection (1).



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 91, 2008 General Session

